Washington statutes.
RCW 41.24.270

State board for volunteer firefighters and reserve officers—Compensation—Travel expenses.

Each member of the state board shall be compensated in accordance with RCW 43.03.240. Each member shall also receive travel expenses, including going to and from meetings of the state board or other authorized business of the state board, in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

[ 1984 c 287 s 70; 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 34 s 87; 1969 c 118 s 8; 1955 c 263 s 4.]

NOTES:

Legislative findings—Severability—Effective date—1984 c 287: See notes following RCW 43.03.220.

Effective date—Severability—1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 34: See notes following RCW 2.08.115.